test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k38_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bógvur
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: bógv
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [bøgi, bógvi]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: bógs
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: [bøgir, bógvar]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: [bøgir, bógvar]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: bógvum
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: bógva
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: bógvurin
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: bógvin
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [bógnum, bógvinum]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: bógsins
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: [bøgirnir, bógvarnir]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: [bøgirnar, bógvarnar]
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: bógvunum
    bógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: bógvanna
